Utah statutes.
31A-23a-411.1.    Person's liability if premium received is not forwarded to the insurer.

A person commits insurance fraud as described in Subsection 31A-31-103(1)(f) if that person knowingly fails to forward to the insurer a premium:

(1)  received from one of the following in partial or total payment of the premium due from:

(a)  an applicant;

(b)  a policyholder; or

(c)  a certificate holder; or

(2)  collected from or on behalf of an insured employee under an insured employee benefit plan.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2003 General Session

